Louisiana, session 2026, HB444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4570.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4570.1. Board of commissioners; officers; quorum; employees
A. The commission shall be composed of five seven ex officio members and
four appointed members for a total of nine eleven commissioners. The ex officio
members shall be the member of the Louisiana Senate who represents District
No. 15, the member of the Louisiana House of Representatives who represents
District No. 61, and the mayors of the following municipalities: Baker, Baton
Rouge, Central, St. George, and Zachary. Each mayor ex officio member may
designate a person to serve in his place as a member of the commission. Each
designee shall serve at the pleasure of the designating mayor member. The ex officio
members shall serve during their terms of office. The four appointed members shall
be qualified voters of the parish appointed by the governing authority of the city of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-507 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 444
Baton Rouge, parish of East Baton Rouge for terms of three years. Of the four
appointed members, at least two shall be residents of the city of Baton Rouge, and
at least one shall be a resident of the unincorporated area of East Baton Rouge
Parish. Following the release of each federal decennial census, the commission may,
by majority vote, reallocate these designated residency requirements to reflect the
changes in population distribution across the parish. Any such reallocation shall
apply prospectively and shall not alter the term of any sitting member. Vacancies
shall be filled by the designating or appointing authority. All commission members
shall serve without compensation.
B. The commission shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice
chairman, and a treasurer whose terms of office shall be one year. Five Six members
shall constitute a quorum of the commission for all purposes. The commission shall
have the power and authority to name and employ a person who shall be designated
as superintendent of the commission, who shall not be a member of the commission,
and who shall be ex officio secretary of the commission, and to prescribe and pay an
annual salary to the superintendent.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.